Utah statutes.
53B-17-403.   Functions of the station.

(1)  The station has the following functions: (a) to conduct experiments and investigations on matters that have the potential to benefit the state's industrial interests or would be for the public good; and (b) to inform the public of the results of the experiments and investigations conducted by the station.

(2)  The station is not to conduct experiments or investigations on those matters that more properly relate to the functions of Utah State University's experiment station.

(3)  The University of Utah makes an annual report on the engineering experiment station to the governor at a time designated by the governor.

